Illinois, session 104th, HB5733.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2.15, 3, 6, 7, and 7.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/2.15)7    Sec. 2.15. Arrest reports and criminal history records.8    (a) Arrest reports. The following chronologically 9maintained arrest and criminal history records information 10maintained by State or local criminal justice agencies shall 11be furnished as soon as practical, but in no event later than 1272 hours after the arrest, notwithstanding the time limits 13otherwise provided for in Section 3 of this Act: (i) 14information that identifies the individual, including the 15name, age, address, and photograph, when and if available; 16(ii) information detailing any charges relating to the arrest; 17(iii) the time and location of the arrest; (iv) the name of the 18investigating or arresting law enforcement agency; (v) 19(blank); and (vi) if the individual is incarcerated, the time 20and date that the individual was received into, discharged 21from, or transferred from the arresting agency's custody.22    (b) Criminal history records. The following documents 23maintained by a public body pertaining to criminal history   HB5733- 2 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1records record information are public records subject to 2inspection and copying by the public pursuant to this Act: (i) 3court records that are public; (ii) records that are otherwise 4available under State or local law; and (iii) records in which 5the requesting party is the individual identified, except as 6provided under Section 7(1)(d)(vi).7    This subsection does not apply to criminal history record 8information as defined in the Illinois Criminal Justice 9Information Act. Criminal history record information is exempt 10from disclosure by (i) the Illinois State Police and (ii) a 11public agency that received criminal history record 12information from the Illinois State Police. 13    (c) Information described in items (iii) through (vi) of 14subsection (a) may be withheld if it is determined that 15disclosure would: (i) interfere with pending or actually and 16reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings conducted 17by any law enforcement agency; (ii) endanger the life or 18physical safety of law enforcement or correctional personnel 19or any other person; or (iii) compromise the security of any 20correctional facility.21    (d) The provisions of this Section do not supersede the 22confidentiality provisions for law enforcement or arrest 23records of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 24    (e) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (a), a 25law enforcement agency may not publish booking photographs, 26commonly known as "mugshots", on its social networking website   HB5733- 3 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1in connection with civil offenses, petty offenses, business 2offenses, Class C misdemeanors, and Class B misdemeanors 3unless the booking photograph is posted to the social 4networking website to assist in the search for a missing 5person or to assist in the search for a fugitive, person of 6interest, or individual wanted in relation to a crime other 7than a petty offense, business offense, Class C misdemeanor, 8or Class B misdemeanor. As used in this subsection, "social 9networking website" has the meaning provided in Section 10 of 10the Right to Privacy in the Workplace Act.11(Source: P.A. 101-433, eff. 8-20-19; 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 12102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.) 13    (5 ILCS 140/3)  (from Ch. 116, par. 203)14    Sec. 3. (a) Each public body shall make available to any 15person for inspection or copying all public records, except as 16otherwise provided in Sections 7 and 8.5 of this Act. 17Notwithstanding any other law, a public body may not grant to 18any person or entity, whether by contract, license, or 19otherwise, the exclusive right to access and disseminate any 20public record as defined in this Act.21    (b) Subject to the fee provisions of Section 6 of this Act, 22each public body shall promptly provide, to any person who 23submits a request, a copy of any public record required to be 24disclosed by subsection (a) of this Section and shall certify 25such copy if so requested.  HB5733- 4 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    (c) Requests for inspection or copies shall be made in 2writing and directed to the public body. Written requests may 3be submitted to a public body via personal delivery, mail, 4telefax, or other means available to the public body. 5Electronic requests under this Section must appear in their 6entirety within the body of the electronic submission. As a 7cybersecurity measure, no public body shall be required to 8open electronically attached files or hyperlinks to view or 9access details of a request. A public body that receives a 10request that would require the public body to open hyperlinks 11or attached files shall, within 5 business days, notify the 12requester of the requirement that the entirety of an 13electronic request must appear within the body of the 14electronic submission. A public body may honor oral requests 15for inspection or copying. A public body may not require that a 16request be submitted on a standard form or require the 17requester to specify the purpose for a request, except to 18determine whether the records are requested for a commercial 19purpose or whether to grant a request for a fee waiver. All 20requests for inspection and copying received by a public body 21shall immediately be forwarded to its Freedom of Information 22officer or designee. 23    (d) Except for requests for records containing video 24records, each Each public body shall, promptly, either comply 25with or deny a request for public records within 5 business 26days after its receipt of the request, unless the time for   HB5733- 5 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1response is properly extended under subsection (e) of this 2Section. Denial shall be in writing as provided in Section 9 of 3this Act. Failure to comply with a written request, extend the 4time for response, or deny a request within 5 business days 5after its receipt shall be considered a denial of the request. 6A public body that fails to respond to a request within the 7requisite periods in this Section but thereafter provides the 8requester with copies of the requested public records may not 9impose a fee for such copies. A public body that fails to 10respond to a request received may not treat the request as 11unduly burdensome under subsection (g). 12    (d-5) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 13Act of the 104th General Assembly, a public body that receives 14a request for a record containing video recordings shall 15either comply with or deny a request for a record that includes 16video records within:17        (1) 5 business days after its receipt of the request, 18    if the public body received 1,000 or fewer requests under 19    this Act in the preceding year; or20        (2) 30 business days after its receipt of the request, 21    if the public body received more than 1,000 requests under 22    this Act in the preceding year. 23    (e) The time for response under this Section may be 24extended by the public body either for not more than 5 business 25days from the original due date for a public body that received 261,000 or fewer requests under this Act in the preceding year or   HB5733- 6 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1for not more than 10 business days from the original due date 2for a public body that received more than 1,000 requests under 3this Act in the preceding year, for any of the following 4reasons:5        (i) the requested records are stored in whole or in 6    part at other locations than the office having charge of 7    the requested records;8        (ii) the request requires the collection of a 9    substantial number of specified records;10        (iii) the request is couched in categorical terms and 11    requires an extensive search for the records responsive to 12    it;13        (iv) the requested records have not been located in 14    the course of routine search and additional efforts are 15    being made to locate them;16        (v) the requested records require examination and 17    evaluation by personnel having the necessary competence 18    and discretion to determine if they are exempt from 19    disclosure under Section 7 of this Act or should be 20    revealed only with appropriate deletions;21        (vi) the request for records cannot be complied with 22    by the public body within the time limits prescribed by 23    subsection (d) of this Section without unduly burdening or 24    interfering with the operations of the public body;25        (vii) there is a need for consultation, which shall be 26    conducted with all practicable speed, with another public   HB5733- 7 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    body or among 2 or more components of a public body having 2    a substantial interest in the determination or in the 3    subject matter of the request.4    The person making a request and the public body may agree 5in writing to extend the time for compliance for a period to be 6determined by the parties. If the requester and the public 7body agree to extend the period for compliance, a failure by 8the public body to comply with any previous deadlines shall 9not be treated as a denial of the request for the records. 10    (f) When additional time is required for any of the above 11reasons, the public body shall, within 5 business days after 12receipt of the request, notify the person making the request 13of the reasons for the extension and the date by which the 14response will be forthcoming. Failure to respond within the 15time permitted for extension shall be considered a denial of 16the request. A public body that fails to respond to a request 17within the time permitted for extension but thereafter 18provides the requester with copies of the requested public 19records may not impose a fee for those copies. A public body 20that requests an extension and subsequently fails to respond 21to the request may not treat the request as unduly burdensome 22under subsection (g).23    (g) Requests calling for all records falling within a 24category shall be complied with unless compliance with the 25request would be unduly burdensome for the complying public 26body and there is no way to narrow the request and the burden   HB5733- 8 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1on the public body outweighs the public interest in the 2information. Before invoking this exemption, the public body 3shall extend to the person making the request an opportunity 4to confer with it in an attempt to reduce the request to 5manageable proportions. If any public body responds to a 6categorical request by stating that compliance would unduly 7burden its operation and the conditions described above are 8met, it shall do so in writing, specifying the reasons why it 9would be unduly burdensome and the extent to which compliance 10will so burden the operations of the public body. Such a 11response shall be treated as a denial of the request for 12information. 13    Repeated requests from the same person for the same 14records that are unchanged or identical to records previously 15provided or properly denied under this Act shall be deemed 16unduly burdensome under this provision.17    (h) Each public body may promulgate rules and regulations 18in conformity with the provisions of this Section pertaining 19to the availability of records and procedures to be followed, 20including:21        (i) the times and places where such records will be 22    made available, and23        (ii) the persons from whom such records may be 24    obtained.25    (i) The time periods for compliance or denial of a request 26to inspect or copy records set out in this Section shall not   HB5733- 9 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1apply to requests for records made for a commercial purpose, 2requests by a recurrent requester, or voluminous requests. 3Such requests shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 43.1, 3.2, and 3.6 of this Act, as applicable. 5    (j) Within 5 business days after its receipt of the 6request, a public body that has a reasonable belief that a 7request was not submitted by a person may require the 8requester to verify orally or in writing that the requester is 9a person. The deadline for the public body to respond to the 10request shall be tolled until the requester verifies that he 11or she is a person. If the requester fails to verify that he or 12she is a person within 30 days after the public body requests 13such a verification, then the public body may deny the 14request. For purposes of this subsection (j), a public body 15may not require the requester to submit personal information, 16private information, or identifying information to verify that 17the requester is a person.18(Source: P.A. 104-438, eff. 1-1-26.) 19    (5 ILCS 140/6)  (from Ch. 116, par. 206)20    Sec. 6. Authority to charge fees. 21    (a) Except for records that are audio or video files 22maintained in an electronic format as provided in subsection 23(a-10), when When a person requests a copy of a record 24maintained in an electronic format, the public body shall 25furnish it in the electronic format specified by the   HB5733- 10 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1requester, if feasible. If it is not feasible to furnish the 2public records in the specified electronic format, then the 3public body shall furnish it in the format in which it is 4maintained by the public body, or in paper format at the option 5of the requester. A public body may charge the requester for 6the actual cost of purchasing the recording medium, whether 7disc, diskette, tape, or other medium. If a request is not a 8request for a commercial purpose or a voluminous request, a 9public body may not charge the requester for the costs of any 10search for and review of the records or other personnel costs 11associated with reproducing the records. Except to the extent 12that the General Assembly expressly provides, statutory fees 13applicable to copies of public records when furnished in a 14paper format shall not be applicable to those records when 15furnished in an electronic format. 16    (a-5) Except for records that are audio or video files 17maintained in an electronic format as provided in subsection 18(a-10), if If a voluminous request is for electronic records 19and those records are not in a portable document format (PDF), 20the public body may charge up to $20 for not more than 2 21megabytes of data, up to $40 for more than 2 but not more than 224 megabytes of data, and up to $100 for more than 4 megabytes 23of data. If a voluminous request is for electronic records and 24those records are in a portable document format, the public 25body may charge up to $20 for not more than 80 megabytes of 26data, up to $40 for more than 80 megabytes but not more than   HB5733- 11 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1160 megabytes of data, and up to $100 for more than 160 2megabytes of data. If the responsive electronic records are in 3both a portable document format and not in a portable document 4format, the public body may separate the fees and charge the 5requester under both fee scales.6    (a-10) If a request is made for an audio or video file that 7is maintained in an electronic format, then the public body 8may not charge for the first 60 minutes of staff time to 9prepare the response, which may include, among other things, 10conducting necessary research regarding the request, as well 11as locating, collecting, reviewing, and redacting any 12responsive audio or video files. After the first 60 minutes of 13staff time, the public body may charge the preparation costs 14of the public body's lowest paid staff member employed in a 15position that performs the work to prepare the response. The 16hourly wage shall be based on the public body's payroll 17records on the date of the receipt of the FOIA request and 18shall be charged in increments of 15 minutes with all partial 19increments rounded down to the nearest 15-minute increment. 20Labor costs shall also include an additional 50% of the hourly 21wage of the public body's lowest paid staff member employed in 22a position that performs the work to partially cover the cost 23of fringe benefits, not to exceed the actual cost of fringe 24benefits. Payment will not be required from (i) a crime victim 25who is the subject of the requested audio or video file or (ii) 26a parent, spouse, child, or legal guardian of a deceased   HB5733- 12 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1person who is the subject of the requested audio or video file. 2It is the obligation of the requesting crime victim or parent, 3spouse, child, or legal guardian of a deceased person to 4provide documentation to establish the requester's 5qualification for the payment exemption under this subsection 6(a-10). If a public body intends to require payment pursuant 7to this subsection (a-10), it must notify the requester within 810 business days of receipt of the request of the minimum 9hourly wage that will be applicable to the preparation cost 10calculation and provide an estimate of the personnel hours 11needed to prepare the response. Within 10 business days of 12receipt of the estimate, the requester must notify the public 13body in writing whether they agree to provide payment in the 14estimated amount or do not wish to proceed with the request. 15Upon the public body's receipt of the requester's written 16agreement to provide payment in the estimated amount, the 17public body will respond to the request in accordance with the 18time periods set forth in subsections (d) and (d-5) of Section 193 of this Act. If the requester agrees to provide payment, 20after preparation of the response, the public body must 21provide the requester with an accounting of all fees, costs, 22and personnel hours in connection with the audio or video 23request for public records. The requester must provide payment 24within 10 business days of receipt of the accounting, and the 25public body must provide the response within 5 business days 26of receipt of payment.   HB5733- 13 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    If a public body imposes a fee pursuant to this subsection 2(a-5), it must provide the requester with an accounting of all 3fees, costs, and personnel hours in connection with the 4request for public records. 5    (b) Except when a fee is otherwise fixed by statute, each 6public body may charge fees reasonably calculated to reimburse 7its actual cost for reproducing and certifying public records 8and for the use, by any person, of the equipment of the public 9body to copy records. No fees shall be charged for the first 50 10pages of black and white, letter or legal sized copies 11requested by a requester. The fee for black and white, letter 12or legal sized copies shall not exceed 15 cents per page. If a 13public body provides copies in color or in a size other than 14letter or legal, the public body may not charge more than its 15actual cost for reproducing the records. In calculating its 16actual cost for reproducing records or for the use of the 17equipment of the public body to reproduce records, a public 18body shall not include the costs of any search for and review 19of the records or other personnel costs associated with 20reproducing the records, except for commercial requests as 21provided in subsection (f) of this Section. Such fees shall be 22imposed according to a standard scale of fees, established and 23made public by the body imposing them. The cost for certifying 24a record shall not exceed $1. 25    (c) Documents shall be furnished without charge or at a 26reduced charge, as determined by the public body, if the   HB5733- 14 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1person requesting the documents states the specific purpose 2for the request and indicates that a waiver or reduction of the 3fee is in the public interest. Waiver or reduction of the fee 4is in the public interest if the principal purpose of the 5request is to access and disseminate information regarding the 6health, safety and welfare or the legal rights of the general 7public and is not for the principal purpose of personal or 8commercial benefit. For purposes of this subsection, 9"commercial benefit" shall not apply to requests made by news 10media when the principal purpose of the request is to access 11and disseminate information regarding the health, safety, and 12welfare or the legal rights of the general public. In setting 13the amount of the waiver or reduction, the public body may take 14into consideration the amount of materials requested and the 15cost of copying them.16    (d) The imposition of a fee not consistent with this 17Section subsections (6)(a) and (b) of this Act constitutes a 18denial of access to public records for the purposes of 19judicial review.20    (e) The fee for each abstract of a driver's record shall be 21as provided in Section 6-118 of "The Illinois Vehicle Code", 22approved September 29, 1969, as amended, whether furnished as 23a paper copy or as an electronic copy.24    (f) A public body may charge up to $10 for each hour spent 25by personnel in searching for and retrieving a requested 26record or examining the record for necessary redactions. No   HB5733- 15 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1fees shall be charged for the first 8 hours spent by personnel 2in searching for or retrieving a requested record. A public 3body may charge the actual cost of retrieving and transporting 4public records from an off-site storage facility when the 5public records are maintained by a third-party storage company 6under contract with the public body. If a public body imposes a 7fee pursuant to this subsection (f), it must provide the 8requester with an accounting of all fees, costs, and personnel 9hours in connection with the request for public records. The 10provisions of this subsection (f) apply only to commercial 11requests. 12(Source: P.A. 97-579, eff. 8-26-11; 98-1129, eff. 12-3-14.) 13    (5 ILCS 140/7)14    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-300)15    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 16    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 17record that contains information that is exempt from 18disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 19that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 20to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 21shall make the remaining information available for inspection 22and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 23be exempt from inspection and copying: 24        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 25    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and   HB5733- 16 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    regulations implementing federal or State law. 2        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 3    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 4    or a court order. 5        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 6    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 7    specifically designed to provide information to one or 8    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 9    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 10        (c) Personal information contained within public 11    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 12    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 13    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 14    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 15    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 16    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 17    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 18    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 19    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 20    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 21    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 22    privacy. 23        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 24    created in the course of administrative enforcement 25    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 26    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the   HB5733- 17 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    extent that disclosure would: 2            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 3        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 4        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 5        agency that is the recipient of the request; 6            (ii) interfere with active administrative 7        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 8        that is the recipient of the request; 9            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 10        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 11        hearing; 12            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 13        confidential source, confidential information 14        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 15        who file complaints with or provide information to 16        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 17        penal agencies; except that the identities of 18        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 19        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 20        local government, except when disclosure would 21        interfere with an active criminal investigation 22        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 23        request; 24            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 25        techniques other than those generally used and known 26        or disclose internal documents of correctional   HB5733- 18 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        agencies related to detection, observation, or 2        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 3        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 4        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 5        request; 6            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 7        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 8            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 9        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 10        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 11    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 12    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 13    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 14    request did not create the record, did not participate in 15    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 16    of the record, and only has access to the record through 17    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 18    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 19    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 20    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.21        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 22    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 23    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 24    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 25    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 26    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit   HB5733- 19 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    Board. 2        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 3    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 4    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 5        (d-8) Records containing law enforcement in-car camera 6    and officer-worn body camera video and audio recordings 7    that a public body received from another public body. 8        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 9    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 10        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 13    materials are available in the library of the correctional 14    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 15    confined. 16        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 19    materials include records from staff members' personnel 20    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 21    information. 22        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 23    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 24    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 25    through an administrative request to the Department of 26    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of   HB5733- 20 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    Mental Health. 2        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 3    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 5    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 6    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 7    institution or facility.8        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 9    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 10    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 11    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 12    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 13    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 14    or school address, work telephone number, social security 15    number, or any other identifying information, except as 16    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 17    or claim. 18        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 19    requested by a person committed to the Department of 20    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 21    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 22    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 23    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 24    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 25    claim. 26        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations,   HB5733- 21 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 2    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 3    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 4    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 5    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 6    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 7    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 8    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 9        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 10    information obtained from a person or business where the 11    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 12    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 13    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 14    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 15    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 16    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 17    requested.18        The information included under this exemption includes 19    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 20    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 21    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 22    company within the investment portfolio of a private 23    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 24    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 25    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 26    to the aggregate financial performance information of a   HB5733- 22 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 2    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 3    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 4    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 5    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 6    privately held company may cause competitive harm.7        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 8    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 9    to disclosure. 10        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 11    agreement, including information which if it were 12    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 13    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 14    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 15    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 16    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 17    award or final selection is made. 18        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 19    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 20    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 21    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 22    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 23    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 24    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 25    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 26    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate   HB5733- 23 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 2    legal rights of the general public. 3        (j) The following information pertaining to 4    educational matters:5            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 6        examination data used to administer an academic 7        examination; 8            (ii) information received by a primary or 9        secondary school, college, or university under its 10        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 11        their academic peers; 12            (iii) information concerning a school or 13        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 14        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 15        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and16            (iv) course materials or research materials used 17        by faculty members. 18        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 19    submissions, and other construction related technical 20    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 21    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 22    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 23    including, but not limited to, power generating and 24    distribution stations and other transmission and 25    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 26    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers,   HB5733- 24 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 2    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 3    security. 4        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 5    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 6    public body makes the minutes available to the public 7    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 8        (m) Communications between a public body and an 9    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 10    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 11    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 12    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 13    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 14    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 15    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 16        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 17    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 18    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 19    cases in which discipline is imposed. 20        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 21    with automated data processing operations, including, but 22    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 23    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 24    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 25    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 26    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other   HB5733- 25 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 2    security of the system or its data or the security of 3    materials exempt under this Section. 4        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 5    between public bodies and their employees or 6    representatives, except that any final contract or 7    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 8        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 9    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 10    an applicant for a license or employment. 11        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 12    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 13    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 14    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 15    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 16    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 17    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 18    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 19    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 20    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 21    until a sale is consummated. 22        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 23    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 24    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 25    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 26    Insurance or self-insurance (including any   HB5733- 26 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    intergovernmental risk management association or 2    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 3    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 4        (t) Information contained in or related to 5    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 6    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 7    for the regulation or supervision of financial 8    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 9    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 10    law. 11        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 12    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 13    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 14    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 15    Electronic Transactions Act. 16        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 17    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 18    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 19    community's population or systems, facilities, or 20    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 21    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 22    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 23    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 24    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 25    include such things as details pertaining to the 26    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to   HB5733- 27 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 2    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 3        (w) (Blank). 4        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 5    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 6    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 7    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 8    Illinois Power Agency. 9        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 10    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 11    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 12    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 13    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 14    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 15    Commission. 16        (z) Information about students exempted from 17    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 18    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 19    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 20    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 21    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 22        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 23    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 24        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 25    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 26    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice   HB5733- 28 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    Mortality Review Team Act. 2        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 3    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 4    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 5    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.6        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 7    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 8    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 9    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 10        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 11    information of persons who are minors and are also 12    participants and registrants in programs of park 13    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 14    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 15    associations.16        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 17    information of participants and registrants in programs of 18    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 19    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 20    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 21    minors.22        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 23    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 24    2012. 25        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 26    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force   HB5733- 29 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 2    School Code and any information contained in that report. 3        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 4    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 5    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 6    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 7    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 8    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 9    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 10    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 11    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 12    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 13    Corrections.14        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 15    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 16        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 17    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 18    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 19    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 20    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 21    of a governmental entity or a person. 22        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 23    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 24    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 25    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 26    the procedure.  HB5733- 30 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 2    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 3    Confidential Reporting Act. 4        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 5    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 6    Act. 7        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 8    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 9        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 10    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 11    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 12    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 13    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 14    Act.15        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 16    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 17        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 18    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 19        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 20    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 21    protected health information, including demographic 22    information, that may be contained within or extracted 23    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 24    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 25    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 26    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45   HB5733- 31 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 2    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 3    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 4    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 5    160.103. 6        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 7    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 8    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 9    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 10        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 11    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 12    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 13    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 14    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 15    include information classified as safeguards, 16    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 17    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 18    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 19    security advisories, and other applicable communications 20    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 21    security sensitive information. 22        (vv) Records concerning the work of the threat 23    assessment team of a law enforcement agency, including, 24    but not limited to, any threat assessment procedure, any 25    information contained in the threat assessment procedure, 26    and any findings or recommendations.   HB5733- 32 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 2Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 3prior to disclosure under this Act. 4    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 5Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 6public records prior to disclosure under this Act.7    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 8paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 9redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 10Act.11    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 12public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 13agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 14behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 15governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 16Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 17for purposes of this Act. 18    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 19information or limit the availability of records to the 20public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 21in this Act. 22(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 241-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 25eff. 1-1-25; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 104-443, eff. 1-1-26; 26revised 1-7-26.)   HB5733- 33 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-300)2    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 3    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 4record that contains information that is exempt from 5disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 6that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 7to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 8shall make the remaining information available for inspection 9and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 10be exempt from inspection and copying: 11        (a) Records created or compiled by a State public 12    defender agency or commission subject to the State Public 13    Defender Act that contain: individual client identity; 14    individual case file information; individual investigation 15    records and other records that are otherwise subject to 16    attorney-client privilege; records that would not be 17    discoverable in litigation; records under Section 2.15; 18    training materials; records related to attorney 19    consultation and representation strategy; or any of the 20    above concerning clients of county public defenders or 21    other defender agencies and firms. This exclusion does not 22    apply to deidentified, aggregated, administrative records, 23    such as general case processing and workload information. 24        (a-5) Information specifically prohibited from 25    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and   HB5733- 34 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    regulations implementing federal or State law. 2        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 3    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 4    or a court order. 5        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 6    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 7    specifically designed to provide information to one or 8    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 9    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 10        (c) Personal information contained within public 11    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 12    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 13    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 14    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 15    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 16    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 17    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 18    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 19    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 20    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 21    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 22    privacy. 23        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 24    created in the course of administrative enforcement 25    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 26    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the   HB5733- 35 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    extent that disclosure would: 2            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 3        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 4        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 5        agency that is the recipient of the request; 6            (ii) interfere with active administrative 7        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 8        that is the recipient of the request; 9            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 10        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 11        hearing; 12            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 13        confidential source, confidential information 14        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 15        who file complaints with or provide information to 16        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 17        penal agencies; except that the identities of 18        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 19        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 20        local government, except when disclosure would 21        interfere with an active criminal investigation 22        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 23        request; 24            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 25        techniques other than those generally used and known 26        or disclose internal documents of correctional   HB5733- 36 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        agencies related to detection, observation, or 2        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 3        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 4        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 5        request; 6            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 7        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 8            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 9        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 10        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 11    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 12    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 13    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 14    request did not create the record, did not participate in 15    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 16    of the record, and only has access to the record through 17    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 18    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 19    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 20    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.21        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 22    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 23    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 24    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 25    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 26    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit   HB5733- 37 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    Board. 2        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 3    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 4    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 5        (d-8) Records containing law enforcement in-car camera 6    and officer-worn body camera video and audio recordings 7    that a public body received from another public body. 8        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 9    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 10        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 13    materials are available in the library of the correctional 14    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 15    confined. 16        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 19    materials include records from staff members' personnel 20    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 21    information. 22        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 23    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 24    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 25    through an administrative request to the Department of 26    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of   HB5733- 38 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    Mental Health. 2        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 3    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 5    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 6    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 7    institution or facility.8        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 9    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 10    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 11    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 12    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 13    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 14    or school address, work telephone number, social security 15    number, or any other identifying information, except as 16    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 17    or claim. 18        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 19    requested by a person committed to the Department of 20    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 21    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 22    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 23    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 24    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 25    claim. 26        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations,   HB5733- 39 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 2    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 3    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 4    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 5    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 6    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 7    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 8    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 9        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 10    information obtained from a person or business where the 11    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 12    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 13    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 14    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 15    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 16    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 17    requested.18        The information included under this exemption includes 19    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 20    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 21    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 22    company within the investment portfolio of a private 23    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 24    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 25    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 26    to the aggregate financial performance information of a   HB5733- 40 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 2    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 3    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 4    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 5    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 6    privately held company may cause competitive harm.7        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 8    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 9    to disclosure. 10        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 11    agreement, including information which if it were 12    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 13    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 14    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 15    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 16    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 17    award or final selection is made. 18        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 19    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 20    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 21    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 22    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 23    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 24    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 25    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 26    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate   HB5733- 41 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 2    legal rights of the general public. 3        (j) The following information pertaining to 4    educational matters:5            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 6        examination data used to administer an academic 7        examination; 8            (ii) information received by a primary or 9        secondary school, college, or university under its 10        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 11        their academic peers; 12            (iii) information concerning a school or 13        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 14        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 15        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and16            (iv) course materials or research materials used 17        by faculty members. 18        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 19    submissions, and other construction related technical 20    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 21    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 22    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 23    including, but not limited to, power generating and 24    distribution stations and other transmission and 25    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 26    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers,   HB5733- 42 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 2    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 3    security. 4        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 5    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 6    public body makes the minutes available to the public 7    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 8        (m) Communications between a public body and an 9    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 10    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 11    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 12    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 13    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 14    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 15    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 16        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 17    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 18    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 19    cases in which discipline is imposed. 20        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 21    with automated data processing operations, including, but 22    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 23    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 24    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 25    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 26    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other   HB5733- 43 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 2    security of the system or its data or the security of 3    materials exempt under this Section. 4        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 5    between public bodies and their employees or 6    representatives, except that any final contract or 7    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 8        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 9    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 10    an applicant for a license or employment. 11        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 12    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 13    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 14    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 15    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 16    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 17    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 18    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 19    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 20    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 21    until a sale is consummated. 22        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 23    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 24    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 25    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 26    Insurance or self-insurance (including any   HB5733- 44 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    intergovernmental risk management association or 2    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 3    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 4        (t) Information contained in or related to 5    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 6    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 7    for the regulation or supervision of financial 8    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 9    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 10    law. 11        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 12    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 13    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 14    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 15    Electronic Transactions Act. 16        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 17    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 18    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 19    community's population or systems, facilities, or 20    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 21    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 22    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 23    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 24    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 25    include such things as details pertaining to the 26    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to   HB5733- 45 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 2    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 3        (w) (Blank). 4        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 5    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 6    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 7    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 8    Illinois Power Agency. 9        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 10    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 11    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 12    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 13    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 14    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 15    Commission. 16        (z) Information about students exempted from 17    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 18    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 19    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 20    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 21    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 22        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 23    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 24        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 25    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 26    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice   HB5733- 46 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    Mortality Review Team Act. 2        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 3    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 4    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 5    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.6        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 7    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 8    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 9    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 10        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 11    information of persons who are minors and are also 12    participants and registrants in programs of park 13    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 14    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 15    associations.16        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 17    information of participants and registrants in programs of 18    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 19    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 20    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 21    minors.22        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 23    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 24    2012. 25        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 26    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force   HB5733- 47 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 2    School Code and any information contained in that report. 3        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 4    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 5    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 6    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 7    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 8    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 9    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 10    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 11    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 12    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 13    Corrections.14        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 15    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 16        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 17    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 18    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 19    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 20    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 21    of a governmental entity or a person. 22        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 23    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 24    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 25    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 26    the procedure.  HB5733- 48 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 2    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 3    Confidential Reporting Act. 4        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 5    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 6    Act. 7        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 8    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 9        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 10    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 11    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 12    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 13    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 14    Act.15        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 16    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 17        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 18    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 19        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 20    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 21    protected health information, including demographic 22    information, that may be contained within or extracted 23    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 24    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 25    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 26    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45   HB5733- 49 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 2    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 3    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 4    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 5    160.103. 6        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 7    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 8    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 9    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 10        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 11    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 12    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 13    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 14    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 15    include information classified as safeguards, 16    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 17    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 18    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 19    security advisories, and other applicable communications 20    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 21    security sensitive information. 22        (vv) Records concerning the work of the threat 23    assessment team of a law enforcement agency, including, 24    but not limited to, any threat assessment procedure, any 25    information contained in the threat assessment procedure, 26    and any findings or recommendations.   HB5733- 50 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 2Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 3prior to disclosure under this Act. 4    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 5Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 6public records prior to disclosure under this Act.7    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 8paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 9redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 10Act.11    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 12public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 13agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 14behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 15governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 16Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 17for purposes of this Act. 18    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 19information or limit the availability of records to the 20public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 21in this Act. 22(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 241-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 25eff. 1-1-25; 104-300, eff. 1-1-27; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 26104-443, eff. 1-1-26; revised 1-7-26.)   HB5733- 51 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-441 and 3104-457)4    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 5by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 6exempt from inspection and copying:7        (a) All information determined to be confidential 8    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 9    Development Act.10        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 11    library users with specific materials under the Library 12    Records Confidentiality Act.13        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 14    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 15    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 16    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 17    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 18    has received.19        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 20    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 21    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 22    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 23    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 24    Infection Control Act.25        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted   HB5733- 52 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.2        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 3    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 4    Qualifications Based Selection Act.5        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 6    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 7    Tuition Act.8        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 9    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 10    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 11    general's office that would be exempt if created or 12    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 13    that Act.14        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 15    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 16    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 17    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.18        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 19    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 20    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.21        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 22    or driver identification information compiled by a law 23    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 24    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.25        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 26    health care facility resident sexual assault and death   HB5733- 53 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 2    Prevention Review Team Act.3        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 4    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 5    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 6    authorized under that Article.7        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 8    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 9    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 10    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 11    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 12    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 13    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.14        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 15    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 16    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.17        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 18    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 19    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 20    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 21    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 22    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 23    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 24    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 25    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 26    Act (repealed).   HB5733- 54 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 2    Personnel Record Review Act. 3        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 4    Illinois School Student Records Act. 5        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 6    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 7        (t) (Blank). 8        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 9    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 10    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 11        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 12    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 13    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 14    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 15    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 16    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 17    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 18    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 19    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 20    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 21        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 22    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 23    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.24        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 25    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 26    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.  HB5733- 55 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 2    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 3    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 4        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 5    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 6    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 7    information about the identity and administrative finding 8    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 9    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 10    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 11    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 12        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 13    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 14    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 15    Act. 16        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 17    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 18        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 19    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 20        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 21    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 22    authorized under that Act.23        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 24    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 25    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 26        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure   HB5733- 56 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 2        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 3    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 4        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 5    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 6    Code. 7        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 8    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 9        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 10    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 11    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 12        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 13    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 14    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 15    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 16    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 17        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 18    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 19        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 20    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 21    Aid Code. 22        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 23    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 24        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 26        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports   HB5733- 57 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    arising out of a peer support counseling session 2    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 3    Suicide Prevention Act. 4        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 5    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 6    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 7    Prevention Act. 8        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 9    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 10    under the Reproductive Health Act. 11        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 12    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 13        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 14    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 15    Human Rights Act.16        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 17    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 18    Act. 19        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 21        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 22    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 23    Public Aid Code. 24        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 26        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or   HB5733- 58 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    information that shall not be made public under the 2    Illinois Insurance Code. 3        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 4    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.5        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 6    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 7        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 8    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 9        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 10    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 11    Police Act. 12        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 13    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 14    Administrative Code of Illinois. 15        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 16    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 17    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 18    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 19        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 20    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 21    Violence Fatality Review Act. 22        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 23    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 24    information used and collected by the Illinois State 25    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 26    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by   HB5733- 59 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 2    July 1, 2028.3        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 4    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 5    Agency Licensing Act. 6        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 7    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 8    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 9    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 10    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 11    Act. 12        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 13    the School Safety Drill Act. 14        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 15    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 16        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 17    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 18    Act. 19        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 20    2-3.196 of the School Code. 21        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 22    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 23    Power Agency Act. 24        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 25    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 26    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act.   HB5733- 60 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 2    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 3        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 5        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 7        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 8    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 9    Modernization Act. 10        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 11    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.12        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 13    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 14    under that Section. 15        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 16    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.17        (www) Criminal history record information, as defined 18    in the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Act. 19        (xxx) Personal and private information, if the 20    personal or private information was submitted to and 21    maintained by the Illinois State Police under the Criminal 22    Identification Act. These records are exempt from 23    disclosure by (i) the Illinois State Police and (ii) a 24    public agency that received this information from the 25    Illinois State Police. Personal information includes dates 26    of birth; race; ethnicity; marital status; medical   HB5733- 61 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    information describing injuries, illnesses, and/or 2    treatments; death-scene images of a decedent; names of 3    surviving victims; and names of uninvolved third parties. 4    In this paragraph (xxx), "private information" has the 5    meaning given to that term under subsection (c-5) of 6    Section 2 and paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of Section 7 7    of this Act. 8(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 9103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 108-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 11eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 12103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 138-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 14eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 15104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; revised 169-10-25.) 17    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457 but 18before 104-441)19    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 20by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 21exempt from inspection and copying:22        (a) All information determined to be confidential 23    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 24    Development Act.25        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying   HB5733- 62 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    library users with specific materials under the Library 2    Records Confidentiality Act.3        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 4    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 5    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 6    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 7    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 8    has received.9        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 10    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 11    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 12    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 13    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 14    Infection Control Act.15        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 16    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.17        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 18    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 19    Qualifications Based Selection Act.20        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 21    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 22    Tuition Act.23        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 24    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 25    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 26    general's office that would be exempt if created or   HB5733- 63 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 2    that Act.3        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 4    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 5    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 6    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.7        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 8    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 9    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.10        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 11    or driver identification information compiled by a law 12    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 13    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.14        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 15    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 16    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 17    Prevention Review Team Act.18        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 19    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 20    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 21    authorized under that Article.22        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 23    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 24    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 25    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 26    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the   HB5733- 64 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 2    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.3        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 4    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 5    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.6        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 7    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 8    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 9    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 10    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 11    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 12    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 13    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 14    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 15    Act (repealed). 16        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 17    Personnel Record Review Act. 18        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 19    Illinois School Student Records Act. 20        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 21    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 22        (t) (Blank). 23        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 24    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 25    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 26        (v) Names and information of people who have applied   HB5733- 65 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 2    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 3    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 4    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 5    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 6    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 7    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 8    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 9    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 10        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 11    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 12    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.13        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 14    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 15    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.16        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 17    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 18    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 19        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 20    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 21    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 22    information about the identity and administrative finding 23    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 24    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 25    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 26    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act.   HB5733- 66 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 2    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 3    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 4    Act. 5        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 6    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 7        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 8    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 9        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 10    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 11    authorized under that Act.12        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 13    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 14    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 15        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 16    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 17        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 18    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 19        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 20    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 21    Code. 22        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 23    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 24        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 25    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 26    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.   HB5733- 67 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 2    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 3    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 4    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 5    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 6        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 7    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 8        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 9    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 10    Aid Code. 11        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 12    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 13        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 15        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 16    arising out of a peer support counseling session 17    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 18    Suicide Prevention Act. 19        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 20    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 21    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 22    Prevention Act. 23        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 24    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 25    under the Reproductive Health Act. 26        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   HB5733- 68 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 2        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 3    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 4    Human Rights Act.5        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 6    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 7    Act. 8        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 9    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 10        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 12    Public Aid Code. 13        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 15        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 16    information that shall not be made public under the 17    Illinois Insurance Code. 18        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 19    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.20        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 21    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 22        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 24        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 25    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 26    Police Act.   HB5733- 69 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 2    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 3    Administrative Code of Illinois. 4        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 5    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 6    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 7    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 8        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 10    Violence Fatality Review Act. 11        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 12    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 13    information used and collected by the Illinois State 14    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 15    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 16    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 17    July 1, 2028.18        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 19    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 20    Agency Licensing Act. 21        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 22    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 23    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 24    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 25    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 26    Act.   HB5733- 70 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 2    the School Safety Drill Act. 3        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 4    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 5        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 6    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 7    Act. 8        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 9    2-3.196 of the School Code. 10        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 11    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 12    Power Agency Act. 13        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 14    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 15    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 16        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 17    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 18        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 19    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 20        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 21    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 22        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 24    Modernization Act. 25        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 26    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.  HB5733- 71 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 2    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 3    under that Section. 4        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 5    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.6        (www) Criminal history record information, as defined 7    in the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Act. 8        (xxx) Personal and private information, if the 9    personal or private information was submitted to and 10    maintained by the Illinois State Police under the Criminal 11    Identification Act. These records are exempt from 12    disclosure by (i) the Illinois State Police and (ii) a 13    public agency that received this information from the 14    Illinois State Police. Personal information includes dates 15    of birth; race; ethnicity; marital status; medical 16    information describing injuries, illnesses, and/or 17    treatments; death-scene images of a decedent; names of 18    surviving victims; and names of uninvolved third parties. 19    Private information is defined in Sections 2(c-5) and 20    7(1)(b) of this Act. 21(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 22103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 238-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 24eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 25103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 268-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081,   HB5733- 72 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 2104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-457, eff. 36-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 4    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-441)5    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 6by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 7exempt from inspection and copying:8        (a) All information determined to be confidential 9    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 10    Development Act.11        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 12    library users with specific materials under the Library 13    Records Confidentiality Act.14        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 15    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 16    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 17    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 18    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 19    has received.20        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 21    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 22    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 23    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 24    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 25    Infection Control Act.  HB5733- 73 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 2    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.3        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 4    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 5    Qualifications Based Selection Act.6        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 7    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 8    Tuition Act.9        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 10    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 11    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 12    general's office that would be exempt if created or 13    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 14    that Act.15        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 16    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 17    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 18    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.19        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 20    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 21    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.22        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 23    or driver identification information compiled by a law 24    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 25    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.26        (l) Records and information provided to a residential   HB5733- 74 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 2    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 3    Prevention Review Team Act.4        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 5    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 6    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 7    authorized under that Article.8        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 9    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 10    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 11    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 12    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 13    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 14    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.15        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 16    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 17    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.18        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 19    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 20    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 21    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 22    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 23    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 24    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 25    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 26    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety   HB5733- 75 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    Act (repealed). 2        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 3    Personnel Record Review Act. 4        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 5    Illinois School Student Records Act. 6        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 7    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 8        (t) (Blank). 9        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 10    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 11    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 12        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 13    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 14    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 15    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 16    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 17    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 18    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 19    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 20    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 21    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 22        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 23    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 24    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.25        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 26    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section   HB5733- 76 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.2        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 3    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 4    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 5        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 6    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 7    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 8    information about the identity and administrative finding 9    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 10    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 11    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 12    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 13        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 14    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 15    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 16    Act. 17        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 18    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 19        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 20    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 21        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 22    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 23    authorized under that Act.24        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 25    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 26    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act.   HB5733- 77 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 2    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 3        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 4    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 5        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 6    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 7    Code. 8        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 9    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 10        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 11    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 12    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 13        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 14    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 15    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 16    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 17    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 18        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 19    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 20        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 21    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 22    Aid Code. 23        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 24    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 25        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 26    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act.   HB5733- 78 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 2    arising out of a peer support counseling session 3    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 4    Suicide Prevention Act. 5        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 6    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 7    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 8    Prevention Act. 9        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 10    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 11    under the Reproductive Health Act. 12        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 14        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 15    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 16    Human Rights Act.17        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 18    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 19    Act. 20        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 21    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 22        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 23    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 24    Public Aid Code. 25        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 26    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act.   HB5733- 79 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 2    information that shall not be made public under the 3    Illinois Insurance Code. 4        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 5    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.6        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 7    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 8        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 10        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 11    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 12    Police Act. 13        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 14    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 15    Administrative Code of Illinois. 16        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 17    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 18    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 19    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 20        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 22    Violence Fatality Review Act. 23        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 24    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 25    information used and collected by the Illinois State 26    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by   HB5733- 80 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 2    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 3    July 1, 2028.4        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 5    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 6    Agency Licensing Act. 7        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 8    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 9    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 10    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 11    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 12    Act. 13        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 14    the School Safety Drill Act. 15        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 16    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 17        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 18    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 19    Act. 20        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 21    2-3.196 of the School Code. 22        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 24    Power Agency Act. 25        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 26    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the   HB5733- 81 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 2        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 3    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 4        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 5    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 6        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 7    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 8        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 10    Modernization Act. 11        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 12    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.13        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 14    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 15    under that Section. 16        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 17    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.18        (vvv) (uuu) Information exempt from disclosure under 19    Section 70 of the End-of-Life Options for Terminally Ill 20    Patients Act.21        (www) Criminal history record information, as defined 22    in the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Act. 23        (xxx) Personal and private information, if the 24    personal or private information was submitted to and 25    maintained by the Illinois State Police under the Criminal 26    Identification Act. These records are exempt from   HB5733- 82 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    disclosure by (i) the Illinois State Police and (ii) a 2    public agency that received this information from the 3    Illinois State Police. Personal information includes dates 4    of birth; race; ethnicity; marital status; medical 5    information describing injuries, illnesses, and/or 6    treatments; death-scene images of a decedent; names of 7    surviving victims; and names of uninvolved third parties. 8    Private information is defined in Sections 2(c-5) and 9    7(1)(b) of this Act. 10(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 11103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 128-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 13eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 14103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 158-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 16eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 17104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-441, eff. 189-12-26; 104-457, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 19    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 20changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 21that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 22represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 23not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 24made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 25Public Act.   HB5733- 83 -LRB104 21238 BDA 35851 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 21, 2027.